California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(d) A licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, member, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee shall not use a badge in connection with the official activities of the licensee’s business.

(e) A licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, member, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee, shall not use a title, or wear a uniform, or use an insignia, or use an identification card, or make any statement with the intent to give an impression that they are connected in any way with the federal government, a state government, or any political subdivision of a state government.

(f) A licensee, or officer, partner, manager, member, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee shall not use any identification to indicate that they are licensed as a private investigator other than the official identification card issued by the bureau or the business card regularly used by the business. However, a licensee may issue an employer identification card.

(g) A licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, member, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee, shall not enter any private building or portion thereof, except premises commonly accessible to the public, without the consent of the owner or of the person in legal possession thereof.

(h) A licensee shall not permit an employee or agent in their own name to advertise, engage clients, furnish reports or present bills to clients, or in any
 manner conduct business for which a license is required under this chapter. All business of the licensee shall be conducted in the name of and under the control of the licensee.

(i) A licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, member, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee shall not knowingly and directly solicit employment from any person who has directly sustained bodily injury or from that person’s spouse or other family member to obtain authorization on behalf of the injured person as an investigator to investigate the accident or act that resulted in injury or death to that person or damage to the property of that person. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the soliciting of employment from that injured person’s attorney, insurance company, self-insured administrator, insurance adjuster, employer, or any other person having an indirect interest in the investigation of the injury. This subdivision shall not apply to any
 business agent or attorney employed by a labor organization. A licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, member, or qualified manager of a licensee shall not pay or compensate any of their employees or agents on the basis of a bonus, bounty, or quota system whereby a premium is placed on the number of employer or client rule violations or infractions purportedly discovered as a result of any investigation made by a licensee.

(j) A licensee shall not use a fictitious business name in connection with the official activities of the licensee’s business, except as provided by the bureau.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 33) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 23.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 24 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

7539.

(a) A licensee or officer, director, partner, or qualified manager of a licensee may divulge to any law enforcement officer or district attorney, or their representative, any information they may acquire as to any criminal offense, but they shall not divulge to any other person, except as otherwise required by law, any information acquired by them except at the direction of the employer or client for whom the information was obtained.

(b) A licensee or officer, director, partner, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee shall not knowingly make any false report to their employer or client for whom information was being obtained.

(c) A written report shall not be submitted to a client except by the
 licensee, qualified manager, or a person authorized by one or either of them, and the person submitting the report shall exercise diligence in ascertaining whether or not the facts and information in the report are true and correct.

(d) A licensee, or officer, director, partner, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee shall not use a badge in connection with the official activities of the licensee’s business.

(e) A licensee, or officer, director, partner, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee, shall not use a title, or wear a uniform, or use an insignia, or use an identification card, or make any statement with the intent to give an impression that they are connected in any way with the federal government, a state government, or any political subdivision of a state government.

(f) A licensee, or officer,
 partner, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee shall not use any identification to indicate that they are licensed as a private investigator other than the official identification card issued by the bureau or the business card regularly used by the business. However, a licensee may issue an employer identification card.

(g) A licensee, or officer, director, partner, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee, shall not enter any private building or portion thereof, except premises commonly accessible to the public, without the consent of the owner or of the person in legal possession thereof.

(h) A licensee shall not permit an employee or agent in their own name to advertise, engage clients, furnish reports or present bills to clients, or in any manner conduct business for which a license is required under this chapter. All business of the licensee shall be conducted in
 the name of and under the control of the licensee.

(i) A licensee, or officer, director, partner, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee, shall not knowingly and directly solicit employment from any person who has directly sustained bodily injury or from that person’s spouse or other family member to obtain authorization on behalf of the injured person as an investigator to investigate the accident or act that resulted in injury or death to that person or damage to the property of that person. This subdivision does not prohibit the soliciting of employment from that injured person’s attorney, insurance company, self-insured administrator, insurance adjuster, employer, or any other person having an indirect interest in the investigation of the injury. This subdivision does not apply to any business agent or attorney employed by a labor organization. A licensee, officer, director, partner, or qualified manager of a licensee shall not pay or
 compensate any of their employees or agents on the basis of a bonus, bounty, or quota system whereby a premium is placed on the number of employer or client rule violations or infractions purportedly discovered as a result of any investigation made by a licensee.

(j) A licensee shall not use a fictitious business name in connection with the official activities of the licensee’s business, except as provided by the bureau.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 34) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 24.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Application of Chapter [7540. - 7542.12.]

7540.

For purposes of this article, “licensee” means a licensed private investigator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7541.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, an applicant, or his or her manager, for a license as a private investigator shall have had at least three years’ experience in investigation work. One year’s experience shall consist of not less than 2,000 hours of actual compensated work performed by each applicant preceding the filing of an application.

(1) An applicant who holds a law degree or bachelor’s degree in police science, criminal justice, criminal law, or the equivalent thereof from an accredited college shall be credited with 2,000 hours of experience in investigation work.

(2) An applicant who holds an associate
 degree in police science, criminal justice, criminal law, or the equivalent thereof from an accredited college shall be credited with 1,000 hours of experience in investigation work.

(3) The total amount of time credited to an applicant for degrees described in this subdivision shall not exceed 2,000 hours of experience in investigation work.

(b) An applicant shall substantiate the claimed years of qualifying experience and the exact details as to the character and nature thereof by written certifications from the employer or qualified manager, subject to independent verification by the director as he or she may determine.

(1) Notwithstanding any other law, only an employer, qualified manager, or his or her
 designated agent may certify experience for purposes of this section.

(2) For purposes of this section, the term “employer” shall mean only those persons, corporations, partnerships, proprietorships, or other associations which, in the employ of the designated individual, regularly and routinely withheld income taxes and other payroll deductions for direct forwarding to governmental taxing authorities.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the term “qualified manager” shall mean only a manager who has qualified pursuant to Section 7536, who has directly overseen the work and experience of the applicant, and is under an employment or contractual arrangement to provide primary supervision of the applicant.

(c) An employer who is a licensee or qualified manager shall respond in writing within 30 days to an applicant’s written request for certifications of the applicant’s work experience as an employee and either provide the certifications or the reasons for denial. If the applicant notifies the director in writing, under penalty of perjury, that the applicant is unable to obtain the required written response from a licensee or qualified manager, or provides the licensee’s or qualified manager’s written denial and states, under penalty of perjury, that the licensee’s or qualified manager’s reasons for denial are invalid or insufficient and the director concurs, the director may require the licensee or qualified manager to provide the bureau with all relevant employment records maintained pursuant to Section 7531.5 regarding the applicant for evaluation in substantiating the applicant’s employment
 experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 31.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7541.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, experience for purposes of taking the examination for licensure as a private investigator shall be limited to those activities actually performed in connection with investigations, as defined in Section 7521, and only if those activities are performed by persons who are employed or managed in the following capacities:

(1) Sworn law enforcement officers possessing powers of arrest and employed by agencies in the federal, state, or local government.

(2) Military police of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard.

(3) An insurance adjuster or their employees subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 5 of the Insurance Code.

(4) Persons employed by a private investigator who are duly licensed in accordance with this chapter, or managed by a qualified manager in accordance with Section 7536.

(5) Persons employed by repossessors duly licensed in accordance with Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500), only to the extent that those persons are routinely and regularly engaged in the location of debtors or the location of personal property utilizing methods commonly known as “skip tracing.” For purposes of this section, only that experience acquired in that skip tracing shall be credited toward qualification to take the examination.

(6) Persons duly trained and certified as an arson investigator and employed by a public agency engaged in fire suppression.

(7) Persons trained as investigators and employed by a public defender to conduct investigations.

(8) (A) Persons trained as investigative reporters and employed by a media source, as defined in Section 1070 of the Evidence Code, whose investigative journalism experience is comprised of conducting primary investigations and producing investigative projects.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph “primary investigation” means original and in-depth research and analysis involving multiple sources, including, but not limited to,
 public records, databases, archives, published and unpublished documents, witnesses, informers, whistleblowers, public officials, and experts, to produce investigative projects. 

(b) The following activities shall not be deemed to constitute acts of investigation for purposes of experience toward licensure:

(1) The serving of legal process or other documents.

(2) Activities relating to the search for heirs or similar searches which involve only a search of public records or other reference sources in the public domain.

(3) The transportation or custodial attendance of persons in the physical custody of a law enforcement agency.

(4) The provision of bailiff or other security services to a court of law.

(5) The collection or attempted collection of debts by telephone or written solicitation after the debtor has been located.

(6) The repossession or attempted repossession of personal property after that property has been located and identified.

(c) Where the activities of employment of an applicant include those which qualify as bona fide experience as stated in this section as well as those which do not qualify, the director may, by delegation to the bureau, determine and apportion that percentage of experience for which any applicant is entitled to credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 32.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7541.2.

The bureau shall consider requiring, and may require, an applicant for licensure to submit proof of satisfactory completion of a course in professional ethics. If the bureau requires an applicant to submit proof of satisfactory completion of a course in professional ethics, the bureau shall specify which courses and course providers satisfy the requirement and shall make that information regarding the course and course providers available on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 11.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.

(a) (1) A licensee or qualified manager of a licensee who, in the course of that person’s employment or business, carries a deadly weapon shall complete a training course in the carrying and use of firearms, as specified in Sections 7585, 7585.1, 7585.2, and 7585.6.

(2) A licensee or qualified manager of a licensee shall not carry or use a firearm unless that person has met the requirements of Sections 7542.2, 7542.3, and 7542.7 and possesses a valid firearms qualification card.

(b) A licensee or qualified manager of a licensee who possesses a valid firearms qualification card shall comply with, and be subject to, Sections 7542.4, 7542.5, 7542.6, 7542.9, 7542.10, 7542.11, and
 7542.12.

(c) A licensee or qualified manager of a licensee who possesses a valid firearms qualification card may carry a firearm capable of being concealed upon the person in a concealed manner if that person complies with applicable provisions set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150) of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(d) If a firearms qualification card is denied, the denial shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if the applicant desires a review by the Private Investigator Disciplinary Review Committee to contest the denial, the review shall be requested of the director within 30 days following the issuance of the denial. A review or hearing shall be held pursuant to Section 7519.3. However, no review or hearing shall be granted to an individual who is otherwise prohibited by
 law from carrying a firearm.

(e) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the use of firearms.

(2) A federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the use of firearms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 9.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.1.

Every licensee and any person employed and compensated by a licensee who in the course of that employment or business carries tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent shall complete the required course pursuant to Section 22835 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.2.

The bureau shall issue a firearms permit when all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) (1) The applicant is a licensee or a qualified manager of a licensee.

(b) The firearms permit is associated with one of the following:

(1) An individual licensed as a private investigator pursuant to Section 7525.1.

(2) A partner of a partnership licensed as a private investigator pursuant to Section 7525.1.

(3) A qualified manager of a licensed private investigator pursuant to Section 7536 or a qualified manager
 license pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7536.

(c) (1) A bureau-certified firearms training instructor certifies that the applicant has successfully completed a written examination prepared by the bureau and a training course in the carrying and use of firearms approved by the bureau.

(2) An applicant who is a bureau-certified firearms training instructor is prohibited from self-certifying as having successfully carried out the requirements of paragraph (1) and shall instead carry out the requirements under another bureau-certified firearms training instructor.

(d) The applicant has filed with the bureau a classifiable fingerprint card, a completed application for a firearms permit on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant, certifying under penalty of perjury
 that the information in the application is true and correct. In lieu of a classifiable fingerprint card, the applicant may submit fingerprints into an electronic fingerprinting system administered by the Department of Justice. An applicant who submits their fingerprints by electronic means shall have their fingerprints entered into the system through a terminal operated by a law enforcement agency or other facility authorized by the Department of Justice to conduct electronic fingerprinting. The terminal operator may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse it for the costs incurred in providing this service.

(e) The applicant is at least 21 years of age and the bureau has determined, after investigation, that the carrying and use of a firearm by the applicant, in the course of the applicant’s duties, presents no apparent threat to the public safety, or that the carrying and use of a firearm by the applicant is not in violation of the Penal
 Code.

(f) The applicant has produced evidence to the firearm training facility that the applicant is a citizen of the United States or has permanent legal immigration status in the United States. Evidence of citizenship or permanent legal immigration status shall be deemed sufficient by the bureau to ensure compliance with federal laws prohibiting possession of firearms by persons unlawfully in the United States and may include, but not be limited to, United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service Form I-151 or United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Form I-551 (Permanent Resident Card), naturalization documents, or birth certificates evidencing lawful residence or status in the United States.

(g) The application is accompanied by the application fees prescribed in this chapter.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.3.

(a) The bureau shall not issue a firearm permit if the applicant is prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law.

(b) Before issuing an initial firearm permit, the bureau shall provide the Department of Justice with the name, address, social security number, and fingerprints of the applicant.

(c) The Department of Justice shall inform the bureau, within 60 days from receipt of the information specified in subdivision (b), of the applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, purchase, or own a firearm pursuant to state and federal law.

(d) An applicant who has been denied a firearm
 permit based upon subdivision (a) may reapply for the permit after the prohibition expires. The bureau shall treat this application as an initial application and shall follow the required screening process as specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 12.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.4.

(a) The bureau shall not renew a firearm permit if the applicant is prohibited from possessing, receiving, purchasing, or owning a firearm pursuant to state or federal law.

(b) Before renewing a firearm permit, the bureau shall provide the Department of Justice with the information necessary to identify the renewal applicant.

(c) The Department of Justice shall inform the bureau, within 30 days of receipt of the information specified in subdivision (b), of the renewal applicant’s eligibility to possess, receive, purchase, or own a firearm pursuant to state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 13.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.5.

(a) The Department of Justice may charge the bureau a fee sufficient to reimburse the department’s costs for furnishing firearm eligibility information upon submission of the application for issuance or renewal of a firearm permit. The fee charged shall not exceed the actual costs for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide this service.

(b) The bureau shall collect the fee described in subdivision (a) for all initial and renewal applications for firearm permits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 791, Sec. 5.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.6.

(a) A firearm permit may be automatically revoked if, at any time, the Department of Justice notifies the bureau that the holder of the firearm permit is prohibited from possessing, receiving, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law. Following the automatic revocation, an administrative hearing shall be provided upon written request to the bureau in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The bureau may seek an emergency order pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 11460.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code against the holder of the firearms permit if, after the bureau’s investigation relating to any of the following
 events, the bureau determines that the holder of the firearms permit presents an undue hazard to public safety that may result in substantial injury to another:

(1) Receipt of subsequent arrest information of an arrest for any of the following:

(A) Assault.

(B) Battery.

(C) Any use of force or violence on any person committed by the permitholder.

(2) A report from a bureau-approved firearms training facility or instructor made pursuant to Section 7585.18.

(3) A report from the permitholder’s employer or former employer that the permitholder may be a threat to public safety.

(4) A complaint filed by any member of the public that the permitholder may be a threat to public safety.

(5) The results of the assessment administered pursuant to Section 7583.47 indicate that the permitholder is incapable of exercising appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control for the purpose of carrying and using a firearm in the course of their duties as a registered security guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 14.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.7.

If an applicant fails to complete his or her application within one year after it has been filed, the application shall be considered to be abandoned. An application submitted subsequent to the abandonment of the former application shall be treated as a new application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 791, Sec. 7.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.9.

The firearms qualification card, if issued, shall be mailed to the applicant at the address which appears on the application. In the event of the loss or destruction of the card, the cardholder may apply to the bureau for a certified replacement of the card, stating the circumstances surrounding the loss, and pay the replacement fee prescribed in this chapter, whereupon the bureau shall issue a certified replacement of the card.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 791, Sec. 8.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.10.

In order to carry a firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, the holder of a firearms qualification card shall comply with Section 7542. A firearms qualification card does not authorize the holder thereof to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 791, Sec. 9.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.11.

(a) A firearms qualification card expires two years from the date of issuance, if not renewed. A person who wishes to renew a firearms qualification card shall file an application for renewal at least 60 days prior to the card’s expiration. A person whose card has expired shall not carry a firearm until the person has been issued a renewal card by the bureau.

(b) The bureau shall not renew a firearms qualification card unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The cardholder has
 filed with the bureau a completed application for renewal of a firearms qualification card, on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury certifying that the information on the application is true and correct.

(2) (A) The applicant has requalified on the range and has successfully passed a written examination based on course content as specified in the firearms training manual approved by the department and taught at a training facility approved by the bureau.

(B) An applicant who is a bureau-certified firearms training instructor is prohibited from self-certifying as having successfully carried out the requirements of
 subparagraph (A) and shall instead carry out the requirements under another bureau-certified firearms training instructor.

(3) The application is accompanied by a firearms requalification fee as prescribed in this chapter.

(4) The applicant has produced evidence to the firearms training facility, either upon receiving
 their original qualification card or upon filing for renewal of that card, that the applicant is a citizen of the United States or has permanent legal immigration status in the United States. Evidence of citizenship or permanent legal immigration status is that deemed sufficient by the bureau to ensure compliance with federal laws prohibiting possession of firearms by persons
 unlawfully in the United States and may include, but not be limited to, the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service Form I-151 or United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Form I-551 (Permanent Resident Card), naturalization documents, or birth certificates evidencing lawful residence or status in the United States.

(c) An expired firearms qualification card may not be renewed. A person with an expired registration is required to apply for a new firearms qualification in the manner required of persons not previously registered. A person whose card has expired shall not carry a firearm until
 that person has been issued a new firearms qualification card by the bureau.

(d) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not apply to a duly appointed peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course of the officer’s duties and who has successfully completed requalification training or to a federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who is authorized to carry a firearm in the course of
 the officer’s duties and who has successfully completed requalification training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 10.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7542.12.

The director may assess fines as enumerated in Article 6 (commencing with Section 7561). Assessment of administrative fines shall be independent of any other action by the bureau or any local, state, or federal governmental agency that may result from a violation of this article. In addition to other prohibited acts under this chapter, no licensee or qualified manager shall, during the course and scope of licensed activity, do any of the following:

(a) Carry any inoperable, replica, or other simulated firearm.

(b) Use a firearm in violation of the law, or in knowing violation
 of the standards for the carrying and usage of firearms as taught in the course of training in the carrying and use of firearms. Unlawful or prohibited uses of firearms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Illegally using, carrying, or possessing a dangerous weapon.

(2) Brandishing a weapon.

(3) Drawing a weapon without proper cause.

(4) Provoking a shooting incident without cause.

(5) Carrying or using a firearm while on duty while under the influence of alcohol or dangerous drugs.

(6) Carrying or using a firearm of a caliber for which a firearms permit has not been issued by the bureau.

(7) Carrying or using a firearm while performing duties not related to the qualifying license or registration to which the bureau associated the firearms permit.

(c) Carry or use a baton in the performance of his or her duties.

(d) Carry or use tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent in the performance of his or her duties unless he or she has in his or her possession proof of completion of a course in the carrying and use of tear gas or any other nonlethal chemical agent.

(e) Carry a concealed pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person unless one of the following circumstances applies:

(1) The person has been issued a permit to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the
 person in a concealed manner by a local law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, 26170, or 26215 of the Penal Code.

(2) The person is a duly appointed peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who is authorized to carry a concealed firearm in the course and scope of his or her employment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 791, Sec. 11.   (SB 1217)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Expiration and Renewal of License [7558. - 7560.]

7558.

(a) A private investigator license, branch office certificate, qualified manager license, and pocket card issued under this chapter expires at midnight on the last day of the month two years following the date of issuance unless renewed.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7558.1.

(a) To renew an unexpired license or certificate, the licensee shall, on or before the date on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director or the director’s designee and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter. On renewal, such evidence of renewal of the license or certificate as the director or the director’s designee may prescribe, and enhanced photo identification cards for the persons mentioned in Section 7529, shall be issued to the licensee.

(b) A license or certificate shall not be renewed until any and all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7564 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section have been paid.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 326, Sec. 6.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7558.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, an expired license or branch office certificate may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration on filing of application for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, and payment of the renewal fee in effect on the last preceding regular renewal date. If the license or certificate is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed in this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license or certificate shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 7558 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

Renewal of a license or certificate shall not prohibit the bringing of disciplinary proceedings for an act committed before the effective date of the renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 18.2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7559.

(a) A suspended license, branch office certificate, or qualified manager certificate is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but renewal of the license does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended, and renewal of the branch office certificate or qualified manager certificate does not entitle the licensee, while the certificate remains suspended, and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity at the location for which the certificate was issued, or to engage in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or
 judgment by which the certificate was suspended.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7559.5.

(a) A revoked license, branch office certificate, or qualified manager certificate is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7560.

A license or branch office certificate which is not renewed within three years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter.

The holder of the license or certificate may obtain a new license or certificate only on compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an original license or certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 18.3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Disciplinary Proceedings [7561. - 7567.]

7561.

Except as otherwise required to comply with the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 7558), the proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7561.1.

The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this chapter if he or she determines that the licensee or his or her qualified manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, members, managers, or qualified manager, has:

(a) Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with an application for a license or a renewal or reinstatement of a license.

(b) Violated any provisions of this chapter.

(c) Violated any rule of the director
 adopted pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter.

(d) Been convicted of any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, including illegally using, carrying, or possessing a deadly weapon.

(e) Impersonated, or permitted or aided and abetted an employee to impersonate a law enforcement officer or employee of the United States of America, or of any state or political subdivision thereof.

(f) Committed or permitted any employee to commit any act, while the license was expired which would be cause for the suspension or revocation of a license, or grounds for the denial of an application for a license.

(g) Willfully failed
 or refused to render to a client services or a report as agreed between the parties and for which compensation has been paid or tendered in accordance with the agreement of the parties.
